District of Columbia statutes.
1-1041.01

Establishment of ward task forces on Advisory Neighborhood Commissions.

(a)

Each member of the Council of the District of Columbia (“Council”) elected from a ward shall appoint a broadly-based ward task force on Advisory Neighborhood Commissions (“ward task force”) for his or her ward.

(b)

In appointing the members of a ward task force, each Councilmember shall give full consideration to assuring fair representation for all racial and ethnic minorities, women, and geographical areas in his or her ward.

(c)

Each member of a ward task force shall be a registered voter and resident of the ward for which his or her ward task force is appointed.

(d)

Each member of the Council elected at-large and the Chairman of the Council may appoint a person to each ward task force.

(e)

Ward task force members shall serve until the ward task force files its final report with the Council unless the Council, by resolution, extends the term of the ward task force.

(f)

Each ward task force member shall serve without compensation.

Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-87, § 2, 29 DCR 433
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-199, § 5, 30 DCR 119

History

Single-member districts, establishment and boundaries, subsequent adjustment of boundaries, see § 1-309.03.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 1-309.03.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 1-1331.

Prior Codifications